Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-606
Incapability; determination; documentation.

(1) A determination that an individual is incapable of making a health care decision shall be made in writing by the primary health care provider and any physician consulted with respect to such determination, and the physician or physicians shall document the cause and nature of the individual's incapability. The determination shall be included in the individual's medical record with the primary health care provider and, when applicable, with the consulting physician and the health care facility in which the individual is a patient or resides. When a surrogate has been designated or determined pursuant to section 30-604, the surrogate shall be included in the individual's medical record.

(2) A physician who has been designated an individual's surrogate shall not make the determination that the individual is incapable of making health care decisions.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 6.